Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-317, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 251, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1-317), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-317. A. A death certificate for each death which


occurs in this state shall be filed with the State Department of


Health within ten (10) calendar days after such death.


B. It shall be the duty of the funeral director to file the


death certificate. If the funeral director is not available, the


person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body in


accordance with Section 1158 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall personally sign and file the death certificate. The funeral


director shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the

Req. No. 3246 Page 1


best qualified person or source available, enter the personal data


into the electronic system prescribed by the State Registrar of


Vital Statistics, and electronically transmit the partial


certificate produced by the electronic system to the physician,


physician assistant, Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or medical


examiner responsible for completing the medical certification


portion of the certificate of death within twenty-four (24) hours


after the death.


C. 1. The medical certification shall be completed and


certified within five (5) calendar days after receipt of the partial


certificate by the physician, physician assistant, or Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse in charge of the patient’s care for the


illness or condition which resulted in death, except when inquiry as


to the cause of death is required by Section 938 of this title. The


physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse shall enter and certify the medical certification portion of


certificate data in the electronic system prescribed by the State


Registrar of Vital Statistics.


2. In the event that the physician, physician assistant, or


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in charge of the patient’s care


for the illness or condition which resulted in death is not in


attendance at the time of death, the medical certification shall be


completed and signed within five (5) calendar days after receipt of


the partial certificate by the physician, physician assistant, or

Req. No. 3246 Page 2


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in attendance at the time of


death, except:


a. when the patient is under hospice care at the time of


death, the medical certification may be signed by the


hospice’s medical director, and


b. when inquiry as to the cause of death is required by


Section 938 of this title.


Provided, that such certification, if signed by other than the


attending physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse, shall note on the face the name of the attending


physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse and that the information shown is only as reported.


3. It shall be the duty of the hospital that employs or


contracts with the physician, physician assistant, or Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse in attendance at the time of death as


described in paragraph 2 of this subsection to ensure that the


medical certification is completed and signed within the time period


specified in paragraph 2 of this subsection.


D. Within four (4) calendar days after receipt of the medical


certification from the physician, physician assistant, or Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse as described in subsection C of this


section, the funeral director shall conduct a final review of the


personal data and the medical certification, electronically sign the


death certificate, and submit the death certificate to the State

Req. No. 3246 Page 3


Registrar of Vital Statistics through the electronic system


prescribed by the State Registrar of Vital Statistics for official


registration.


E. A certifier completing cause of death on a certificate of


death who knows that a lethal drug, overdose or other means of


assisting suicide within the meaning of Sections 3141.2 through


3141.4 of this title caused or contributed to the death shall list


that means among the chain of events under cause of death or list it


in the box that describes how the injury occurred. If such means is


in the chain of events under cause of death or in the box that


describes how the injury occurred, the certifier shall indicate


“suicide” as the manner of death.


F. The authority of a physician assistant to carry out the


functions described in this section shall be governed by the


practice agreement as provided by Section 519.6 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


G. A physician, physician assistant, or Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse completing and signing a medical certification in


accordance with this section shall not be liable in a civil action


to recover damages for any acts or omissions relating to the medical


certification if the cause of death is determined in good faith


using the individual’s best clinical judgment consistent with


current guidance provided by the applicable licensing board, unless


the acts or omissions amount to willful or wanton misconduct. The

Req. No. 3246 Page 4


immunity provided by this subsection shall be in addition to any


other immunity from liability to which these individuals may be


entitled.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3246 DC 1/15/2026 8:40:54 AM





































Req. No. 3246 Page 5